Utah statutes.
38-2-3.   Repairman's lien on personal property -- Lien subject to rights of secured parties.

Every person who shall make, alter or repair, or bestow labor upon, any article of personal property at the request of the owner or other person entitled to possession thereof shall have a lien upon such article for the reasonable value of the labor performed and materials furnished and used in making such article or in altering or repairing the same, and may retain possession thereof until the amount so due is paid; provided such lien and right to possession shall be subject and subordinate to the rights and interests of any secured parties in such personal property unless such secured party has requested such person to make, alter or repair or bestow labor upon such property.



Amended by Chapter 272, 1977 General Session

